Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-422
Delivering prisoners to chief executive officer; documents.

When any convicted prisoner is delivered to the chief executive officer, the officer having the prisoner in charge shall deliver to the chief executive officer a certified copy of the sentence received by the officer from the clerk of the district court and shall take from the chief executive officer a certificate of the delivery of the prisoner. The certified copy of the sentence shall be evidence of the facts contained therein.

Laws 1897, c. 75, § 33, p. 341;

R.S.1913, § 7338;

C.S.1922, § 6998;

C.S.1929, § 83-935;

R.S.1943, § 83-422;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 34.

When the certified copy of judgment or sentence includes a statement of the nature of the imprisonment imposed and the duration thereof, it fulfills all purposes contemplated by this section. Dunham v. O'Grady, 137 Neb. 649, 290 N.W. 723 (1940).

Provisions hereof, relative to delivery of convicts to penitentiary, are equally applicable to state reformatory for men. Myers v. Fenton, 121 Neb. 56, 236 N.W. 143 (1931).